Massachusetts, session 194th, S1119.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after Chapter 151F the
following chapter:-
Chapter 151G.
FAIR INVESTMENT PRACTICES.
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Commission”, the Massachusetts commission against discrimination, established by
section 56 of chapter 6.
of 5

“Derivative investment”, an acquisition of securities by a venture capital company in the
ordinary course of the venture capital company’s business in exchange for an existing venture
capital investment either: (i) upon the exercise or conversion of the existing venture capital
investment; or (ii) in connection with a public offering of securities or the merger or
reorganization of the operating company to which the existing venture capital investment relates.
“Historically disadvantaged members of protected classes”, members of protected classes
that have historically received less in professional investor funding than their respective shares of
the population.
“Professional investor”, one or more persons, including but not limited to, a bank, bank
holding company, savings institution, trust company, insurance company, investment company
registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, pension or profit-sharing trust or
other financial institution or institutional buyer, licensee under the Federal Small Business
Investment Act of 1958, partnership, association, corporation, legal representative, trustee,
trustee in bankruptcy, receiver, and venture capital fund, whose business includes sponsoring,
guaranteeing or granting funds or engaging in investment transactions.
“Protected characteristic”, race; color; religious creed; national origin; sex; gender
identity; sexual orientation, which shall not include sexual orientation involving minor children
as the sex object; age; genetic information; ancestry; status as a veteran; handicap; or pregnancy
or a condition related to said pregnancy including, but not limited to, lactation or the need to
express breast milk for a nursing child.
“Protected class”, a group of people sharing a protected characteristic.
of 5

“Venture capital company”, an entity that: (i) on at least one occasion during the annual
period commencing with the date of the entity’s initial capitalization, and on at least one
occasion during each annual period thereafter, at least 50 per cent of the entity’s assets other than
short-term investments pending long-term commitment or distribution to investors, valued at
cost, are venture capital investments or derivative investments; (ii) the entity is a “venture capital
fund” as defined in 17 C.F.R. section 275.203 (l)-(1); or (iii) the entity is a “venture capital
operating company” as defined in 29 C.F.R. section 2510.3-101(d).
“Venture capital fund”, shall have the same meaning as defined in 17 C.F.R. section
275.203 (l)-(1).
“Venture capital investment”, an acquisition of securities in an operating company as to
which the investment adviser, the entity advised by the investment adviser, or an affiliated
person of either has or obtains management rights.
Section 2. Professional investors, including but not limited to venture capital firms,
private equity firms, hedge funds and investment banks, must comply with the compliance
guidelines established in section 4. Said professional investors shall not engage in investment
activities or business practices in the commonwealth without complying with section 4.
Section 3. Failure to comply with section 2 shall be an unfair or deceptive trade practice
under chapter 93A subject to challenge pursuant to section 4 of said chapter 93A but not
pursuant to sections 9 or 11 of said chapter 93A. In addition to seeking any civil penalties, costs,
or fees, the attorney general may seek, and the court may grant, damages, including, but not
limited to, compensatory, incidental, consequential and punitive damages, on behalf of those
of 5

affected by a violation. The attorney general may also seek and the court may grant, injunctive
and other appropriate equitable relief.
Section 4. (a) The attorney general, in consultation with the commission and the secretary
of state shall require professional investors to follow compliance guidelines that require
professional investors to, at minimum:
(1) include a written policy in the professional investor’s organizational charter that
details how the professional investor will comply with the requirements of this chapter;
(2) adopt clear, written procedures specifying how the professional investor and the
professional investor’s employees and agents will ensure that said professional investors,
employees, and agents and said professional investor’s organization comply with the
requirements of this chapter;
(3) complete and submit to the attorney general a written self-evaluation at least once
every 3 years, of the professional investor’s investments and investment decisions that evaluates
whether the professional investor has made reasonable progress towards providing a greater
share of the professional investor’s funding to historically disadvantaged members of protected
classes and entities and ventures that historically disadvantaged members of protected classes
direct, own or manage; provided, however, that the evaluation shall include a reasonable amount
of detail, but in no event shall the professional investor include in their evaluation confidential or
proprietary information or trade secrets; provided further that submitted written self-evaluations
shall be public records for the purpose of clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4; and
(4) comply with the rules, regulations, and other guidance developed by the attorney
general under this chapter.
of 5

(b) As needed, but not less than every 3 years, the attorney general, in consultation with
the commission and the secretary of state, shall update the compliance guidelines.
(c) The attorney general shall promulgate rules, regulations or other guidelines to
implement this section. Such rules, regulations or other guidelines may include model templates
for a professional investor to modify and adopt for its particular use.
Section 5. This chapter shall be construed liberally to accomplish its purposes. Nothing
contained in this chapter shall be deemed to repeal any provision of any other law of this
commonwealth.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the attorney
general, in consultation with the commission and the secretary of state, shall publish compliance
guidelines, as required by section 4 of chapter 151G of the General Laws, not later than 1 year
after the effective date of this act.
of 5